Utah statutes.
53B-10-103.   Incentive loan appropriation -- Administration of incentive
loan program.
(1)  Subject to future budget constraints, the Legislature shall provide an
annual appropriation to the State Board of Regents for the Terrel H. Bell
Teaching Incentive Loans Program established in Section 53B-10-101.
(2)  The State Board of Regents shall administer the Terrel H. Bell Teaching
Incentive Loans Program in accordance with criteria, policies, and procedures
established by the board and the State Board of Education.
